Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 26.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1828
Organ and tissue
donations; failure to complete preliminary investigation; effect.

If the coroner, coroner's physician, or other physician designated
by the coroner fails to complete the preliminary investigation required under
section 23-1827, or if the coroner fails to designate the coroner's physician
or another physician to conduct and complete the preliminary investigation,
within a time period compatible with the preservation of the organs and tissues
for the purpose of transplantation, or if the coroner declines to conduct
the preliminary investigation, any organ or tissue that is compatible for
transplantation may be recovered pursuant to the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act as though
the donor was not within the coroner's jurisdiction.

Laws 2008, LB246, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 26.

Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, see section 71-4824.